Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-720
Division of political party ballot;
preference; how determined; dissolution of political party; procedure; effect.

(1) In case
of a division of any political party, the Secretary of State shall give the
preference of party name to the convention held at the time and place designated
in the call of the regularly constituted political party authorities, and
if the other faction presents no other party name, the Secretary of State
shall select a name or title and place the same on the ballot before the list
of candidates of such faction. The action of the preceding national convention
of such party, regularly called, shall determine the action of the Secretary
of State or the court in its decision. The Secretary of State may be compelled
by peremptory order of mandamus to perform such duty.

(2) A political party
may dissolve by filing a notice of dissolution with the Secretary of State.
The notice shall be filed by the executive committee or state central committee
of the political party or, if no such committee exists, by an officer of the
political party. If the notice is filed prior to December 1 of the calendar
year before the statewide primary election, the Secretary of State shall not
accept any filings for the political party or place the political party on
the statewide primary election ballot for the statewide primary election.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 220;

Laws 2014, LB1048, § 11.